Illinois, session 104th, HB5423.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-17a as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-17a)7    Sec. 10-17a. State, school district, and school report 8cards; Expanded High School Snapshot Report. 9    (1) By October 31, 2013 and October 31 of each subsequent 10school year, the State Board of Education, through the State 11Superintendent of Education, shall prepare a State report 12card, school district report cards, and school report cards, 13and shall by the most economical means provide to each school 14district in this State, including special charter districts 15and districts subject to the provisions of Article 34, the 16report cards for the school district and each of its schools. 17Because of the impacts of the COVID-19 public health emergency 18during school year 2020-2021, the State Board of Education 19shall have until December 31, 2021 to prepare and provide the 20report cards that would otherwise be due by October 31, 2021. 21During a school year in which the Governor has declared a 22disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 237 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act, the report   HB5423- 2 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1cards for the school districts and each of its schools shall be 2prepared by December 31.3    (2) In addition to any information required by federal 4law, the State Superintendent shall determine the indicators 5and presentation of the school report card, which must 6include, at a minimum, the most current data collected and 7maintained by the State Board of Education related to the 8following:9        (A) school characteristics and student demographics, 10    including average class size, average teaching experience, 11    student racial/ethnic breakdown, and the percentage of 12    students classified as low-income; the percentage of 13    students classified as English learners, the number of 14    students who graduate from a bilingual or English learner 15    program, and the number of students who graduate from, 16    transfer from, or otherwise leave bilingual programs; the 17    percentage of students who have individualized education 18    plans or 504 plans that provide for special education 19    services; the number and the percentage of all students in 20    grades kindergarten through 8, disaggregated by the 21    student demographics described in this paragraph (A), in 22    each of the following categories: (i) those who have been 23    assessed for placement in a gifted education program or 24    accelerated placement, (ii) those who have enrolled in a 25    gifted education program or in accelerated placement, and 26    (iii) for each of categories (i) and (ii), those who   HB5423- 3 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1    received direct instruction from a teacher who holds a 2    gifted education endorsement; the number and the 3    percentage of all students in grades 9 through 12, 4    disaggregated by the student demographics described in 5    this paragraph (A), who have been enrolled in an advanced 6    academic program; the percentage of students scoring at 7    the "exceeds expectations" level on the assessments 8    required under Section 2-3.64a-5 of this Code; the 9    percentage of students who annually transferred in or out 10    of the school district; average daily attendance; the 11    per-pupil operating expenditure of the school district; 12    and the per-pupil State average operating expenditure for 13    the district type (elementary, high school, or unit);14        (B) curriculum information, including, where 15    applicable, Advanced Placement, International 16    Baccalaureate or equivalent courses, dual credit courses, 17    foreign language classes, computer science courses, school 18    personnel resources (including Career Technical Education 19    teachers), before and after school programs, 20    extracurricular activities, subjects in which elective 21    classes are offered, health and wellness initiatives 22    (including the average number of days of Physical 23    Education per week per student), approved programs of 24    study, awards received, community partnerships, and 25    special programs such as programming for the gifted and 26    talented, students with disabilities, and work-study   HB5423- 4 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1    students;2        (C) student outcomes, including, where applicable, the 3    percentage of students deemed proficient on assessments of 4    State standards, the percentage of students in the eighth 5    grade who pass Algebra, the percentage of students who 6    participated in workplace learning experiences, the 7    percentage of students enrolled in post-secondary 8    institutions (including colleges, universities, community 9    colleges, trade/vocational schools, and training programs 10    leading to career certification within 2 semesters of high 11    school graduation), the percentage of students graduating 12    from high school who are college and career ready, the 13    percentage of graduates enrolled in community colleges, 14    colleges, and universities who are in one or more courses 15    that the community college, college, or university 16    identifies as a developmental course, and the percentage 17    of students with disabilities under the federal 18    Individuals with Disabilities Education Act and Article 14 19    of this Code who have fulfilled the minimum State 20    graduation requirements set forth in Section 27-605 of 21    this Code and have been issued a regular high school 22    diploma; 23        (D) student progress, including, where applicable, the 24    percentage of students in the ninth grade who have earned 25    5 credits or more without failing more than one core 26    class, a measure of students entering kindergarten ready   HB5423- 5 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1    to learn, a measure of growth, and the percentage of 2    students who enter high school on track for college and 3    career readiness;4        (E) the school environment, including, where 5    applicable, high school dropout rate by grade level, the 6    percentage of students with less than 10 absences in a 7    school year, the percentage of teachers with less than 10 8    absences in a school year for reasons other than 9    professional development, leaves taken pursuant to the 10    federal Family Medical Leave Act of 1993, long-term 11    disability, or parental leaves, the 3-year average of the 12    percentage of teachers returning to the school from the 13    previous year, the number of different principals at the 14    school in the last 6 years, the number of teachers who hold 15    a gifted education endorsement, the process and criteria 16    used by the district to determine whether a student is 17    eligible for participation in a gifted education program 18    or advanced academic program and the manner in which 19    parents and guardians are made aware of the process and 20    criteria, the number of teachers who are National Board 21    Certified Teachers, disaggregated by race and ethnicity, 2 22    or more indicators from any school climate survey selected 23    or approved by the State and administered pursuant to 24    Section 2-3.153 of this Code, with the same or similar 25    indicators included on school report cards for all surveys 26    selected or approved by the State pursuant to Section   HB5423- 6 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1    2-3.153 of this Code, the combined percentage of teachers 2    rated as proficient or excellent in their most recent 3    evaluation, and, beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, 4    data on the number of incidents of violence that occurred 5    on school grounds or during school-related activities and 6    that resulted in an out-of-school suspension, expulsion, 7    or removal to an alternative setting, as reported pursuant 8    to Section 2-3.162;9        (F) a school district's and its individual schools' 10    balanced accountability measure, in accordance with 11    Section 2-3.25a of this Code;12        (G) the total and per pupil normal cost amount the 13    State contributed to the Teachers' Retirement System of 14    the State of Illinois in the prior fiscal year for the 15    school's employees, which shall be reported to the State 16    Board of Education by the Teachers' Retirement System of 17    the State of Illinois;18        (H) for a school district organized under Article 34 19    of this Code only, State contributions to the Public 20    School Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of Chicago 21    and State contributions for health care for employees of 22    that school district; 23        (I) a school district's Final Percent of Adequacy, as 24    defined in paragraph (4) of subsection (f) of Section 25    18-8.15 of this Code;26        (J) a school district's Local Capacity Target, as   HB5423- 7 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1    defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Section 2    18-8.15 of this Code, displayed as a percentage amount;3        (K) a school district's Real Receipts, as defined in 4    paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 18-8.15 of this 5    Code, divided by a school district's Adequacy Target, as 6    defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 7    18-8.15 of this Code, displayed as a percentage amount; 8        (L) a school district's administrative costs;9        (M) whether or not the school has participated in the 10    Illinois Youth Survey. In this paragraph (M), "Illinois 11    Youth Survey" means a self-report survey, administered in 12    school settings every 2 years, designed to gather 13    information about health and social indicators, including 14    substance abuse patterns and the attitudes of students in 15    grades 8, 10, and 12; 16        (N) whether the school offered its students career and 17    technical education opportunities; and 18        (O) beginning with the October 2024 report card, the 19    total number of school counselors, school social workers, 20    school nurses, and school psychologists by school, 21    district, and State, the average number of students per 22    school counselor in the school, district, and State, the 23    average number of students per school social worker in the 24    school, district, and State, the average number of 25    students per school nurse in the school, district, and 26    State, and the average number of students per school   HB5423- 8 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1    psychologist in the school, district, and State; and . 2        (P) beginning with the October 2026 report card, each 3    school district must report to the State Board of 4    Education on or before October 1 each year, the total 5    student capacity for each school in the school district. 6    The school report card shall also provide information that 7allows for comparing the current outcome, progress, and 8environment data to the State average, to the school data from 9the past 5 years, and to the outcomes, progress, and 10environment of similar schools based on the type of school and 11enrollment of low-income students, special education students, 12and English learners.13    As used in this subsection (2): 14    "Accelerated placement" has the meaning ascribed to that 15term in Section 14A-17 of this Code. 16    "Administrative costs" means costs associated with 17executive, administrative, or managerial functions within the 18school district that involve planning, organizing, managing, 19or directing the school district. 20    "Advanced academic program" means a course of study, 21including, but not limited to, accelerated placement, advanced 22placement coursework, International Baccalaureate coursework, 23dual credit, or any course designated as enriched or honors, 24that a student is enrolled in based on advanced cognitive 25ability or advanced academic achievement compared to local age 26peers and in which the curriculum is substantially   HB5423- 9 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1differentiated from the general curriculum to provide 2appropriate challenge and pace. 3    "Computer science" means the study of computers and 4algorithms, including their principles, their hardware and 5software designs, their implementation, and their impact on 6society. "Computer science" does not include the study of 7everyday uses of computers and computer applications, such as 8keyboarding or accessing the Internet. 9    "Gifted education" means educational services, including 10differentiated curricula and instructional methods, designed 11to meet the needs of gifted children as defined in Article 14A 12of this Code. 13    For the purposes of paragraph (A) of this subsection (2), 14"average daily attendance" means the average of the actual 15number of attendance days during the previous school year for 16any enrolled student who is subject to compulsory attendance 17by Section 26-1 of this Code at each school and charter school. 18    (2.5) For any school report card prepared after July 1, 192025, for all high school graduation completion rates that are 20reported on the school report card as required under this 21Section or by any other State or federal law, the State 22Superintendent of Education shall also report the percentage 23of students who did not meet the requirements of high school 24graduation completion for any reason and, of those students, 25the percentage that are classified as students who fulfill the 26requirements of Section 14-16 of this Code.  HB5423- 10 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1    The State Superintendent shall ensure that for the 22023-2024 school year there is a specific code for districts 3to report students who fulfill the requirements of Section 414-16 of this Code to ensure accurate reporting under this 5Section.6    All reporting requirements under this subsection (2.5) 7shall be included on the school report card where high school 8graduation completion rates are reported, along with a brief 9explanation of how fulfilling the requirements of Section 1014-16 of this Code is different from receiving a regular high 11school diploma. 12    (3) At the discretion of the State Superintendent, the 13school district report card shall include a subset of the 14information identified in paragraphs (A) through (E) of 15subsection (2) of this Section, as well as information 16relating to the operating expense per pupil and other finances 17of the school district, and the State report card shall 18include a subset of the information identified in paragraphs 19(A) through (E) and paragraph (N) of subsection (2) of this 20Section. The school district report card shall include the 21average daily attendance, as that term is defined in 22subsection (2) of this Section, of students who have 23individualized education programs and students who have 504 24plans that provide for special education services within the 25school district. 26    (4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this   HB5423- 11 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1Section, in consultation with key education stakeholders, the 2State Superintendent shall at any time have the discretion to 3amend or update any and all metrics on the school, district, or 4State report card. 5    (5) Annually, no more than 30 calendar days after receipt 6of the school district and school report cards from the State 7Superintendent of Education, each school district, including 8special charter districts and districts subject to the 9provisions of Article 34, shall present such report cards at a 10regular school board meeting subject to applicable notice 11requirements, post the report cards on the school district's 12Internet web site, if the district maintains an Internet web 13site, make the report cards available to a newspaper of 14general circulation serving the district, and, upon request, 15send the report cards home to a parent (unless the district 16does not maintain an Internet web site, in which case the 17report card shall be sent home to parents without request). If 18the district posts the report card on its Internet web site, 19the district shall send a written notice home to parents 20stating (i) that the report card is available on the web site, 21(ii) the address of the web site, (iii) that a printed copy of 22the report card will be sent to parents upon request, and (iv) 23the telephone number that parents may call to request a 24printed copy of the report card.25    (6) Nothing contained in Public Act 98-648 repeals, 26supersedes, invalidates, or nullifies final decisions in   HB5423- 12 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1lawsuits pending on July 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public 2Act 98-648) in Illinois courts involving the interpretation of 3Public Act 97-8. 4    (7) As used in this subsection (7):5    "Advanced coursework or programs" means any high school 6courses, sequence of courses, or class or grouping of students 7organized to provide more rigorous, enriched, advanced, 8accelerated, gifted, or above grade-level instruction. This 9may include, but is not limited to, Advanced Placement 10courses, International Baccalaureate courses, honors, 11weighted, advanced, or enriched courses, or gifted or 12accelerated programs, classrooms, or courses.13    "Course" means any high school class or course offered by 14a school that is assigned a school course code by the State 15Board of Education. 16    "High school" means a school that maintains any of grades 179 through 12.18    "Standard coursework or programs" means any high school 19courses or classes other than advanced coursework or programs. 20    By December 31, 2027 and by December 31 of each subsequent 21year, the State Board of Education, through the State 22Superintendent of Education, shall prepare a stand-alone 23report covering all public high schools in this State, to be 24referred to as the Expanded High School Coursework Snapshot 25Report. The State Board shall post the Report on the State 26Board's Internet website. Each school district with high   HB5423- 13 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1school enrollment for the reporting year shall include on the 2school district's Internet website, if the district maintains 3an Internet website, a hyperlink to the Report on the State 4Board's Internet website titled "Expanded High School 5Coursework Snapshot Report". Hyperlinks under this subsection 6(7) shall be displayed in a manner that is easily accessible to 7the public.8    The Expanded High School Coursework Snapshot Report shall 9include:10        (A) a listing of all standard coursework or programs 11    that have high school student enrollment;12        (B) a listing of all advanced coursework or programs 13    that have high school student enrollment;14        (C) a listing of all coursework or programs that have 15    high school student enrollment by English learners;16        (D) a listing of all coursework or programs that have 17    high school student enrollment by students with 18    disabilities;19        (E) data tables and graphs comparing advanced 20    coursework or programs enrollment with standard coursework 21    or programs enrollment according to the following 22    parameters:23            (i) the average years of experience of all 24        teachers in a high school who are assigned to teach 25        advanced coursework or programs compared with the 26        average years of experience of all teachers in the   HB5423- 14 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1        high school who are assigned to teach standard 2        coursework or programs;3            (ii) the average years of experience of all 4        teachers in a high school who are assigned to teach 5        coursework or programs that have high school 6        enrollment by students with disabilities compared with 7        the average years of experience of all teachers in the 8        high school who are not assigned to teach coursework 9        or programs that have high school student enrollment 10        by students with disabilities;11            (iii) the average years of experience of all 12        teachers in a high school who are assigned to teach 13        coursework or programs that have high school student 14        enrollment by English learners compared with the 15        average years of experience of all teachers in the 16        high school who are not assigned to teach coursework 17        or programs that have high school student enrollment 18        by English learners;19            (iv) the number of high school teachers who 20        possess bachelor's degrees, master's degrees, or 21        higher degrees and who are assigned to teach advanced 22        coursework or programs compared with the number of 23        teachers who possess bachelor's degrees, master's 24        degrees, or higher degrees and who are assigned to 25        teach standard coursework or programs;26            (v) the number of high school teachers who possess   HB5423- 15 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1        bachelor's degrees, master's degrees, or higher 2        degrees and who are assigned to teach coursework or 3        programs that have high school student enrollment by 4        students with disabilities compared with the number of 5        teachers who possess bachelor's degrees, master's 6        degrees, or higher degrees and who are not assigned to 7        teach coursework or programs that have high school 8        student enrollment by students with disabilities;9            (vi) the number of high school teachers who 10        possess bachelor's degrees, master's degrees, or 11        higher degrees and who are assigned to teach 12        coursework or programs that have high school student 13        enrollment by English learners compared with the 14        number of teachers who possess bachelor's degrees, 15        master's degrees, or higher degrees and who are not 16        assigned to teach coursework or programs that have 17        high school student enrollment by English learners;18            (vii) the average student enrollment of advanced 19        coursework or programs offered in a high school 20        compared with the average student enrollment of 21        standard coursework or programs;22            (viii) the percentages of high school students, by 23        race, gender, and program student group, who are 24        enrolled in advanced coursework or programs;25            (ix) (blank);26            (x) (blank);  HB5423- 16 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1            (xi) (blank);2            (xii) (blank);3            (xiii) (blank);4            (xiv) the percentage of high school students, by 5        race, gender, and program student group, who earn the 6        equivalent of a C grade or higher on a grade A through 7        F scale in one or more advanced coursework or programs 8        compared with the percentage of high school students, 9        by race, gender, and program student group, who earn 10        the equivalent of a C grade or higher on a grade A 11        through F scale in one or more standard coursework or 12        programs;13            (xv) (blank);14            (xvi) (blank); and15        (F) data tables and graphs for each race and ethnicity 16    category and gender category describing:17            (i) the total student number and student 18        percentage for Advanced Placement courses taken by 19        race and ethnicity category and gender category;20            (ii) the total student number and student 21        percentage for International Baccalaureate courses 22        taken by race and ethnicity category and gender 23        category;24            (iii) (blank);25            (iv) (blank); and26            (v) the total student number and student   HB5423- 17 -LRB104 20179 LNS 33630 b1        percentage of high school students who earn a score of 2        3 or higher on the Advanced Placement exam associated 3        with an Advanced Placement course. 4    For data on teacher experience and education under this 5subsection (7), a teacher who teaches a combination of courses 6designated as advanced coursework or programs, courses or 7programs that have high school student enrollment by English 8learners, or standard coursework or programs shall be included 9in all relevant categories and the teacher's level of 10experience shall be added to the categories.11(Source: P.A. 103-116, eff. 6-30-23; 103-263, eff. 6-30-23; 12103-413, eff, 1-1-24; 103-503, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 137-1-24; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24; 104-391, eff. 8-15-25.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.